test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-caallim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - čäällim: # 1B v-g, ääll-›äl
    čäällim+N+Sg+Nom: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Gen: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Acc: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Ill: čälimân
    čäällim+N+Sg+Loc: čälimist
    čäällim+N+Sg+Com: čälimáin
    čäällim+N+Sg+Abe: čäällimttáá
    čäällim+N+Ess: čälimin
    čäällim+N+Par: čälimid
    čäällim+N+Pl+Nom: čälimeh
    čäällim+N+Pl+Gen: čälimij
    čäällim+N+Pl+Acc: čälimijd
    čäällim+N+Pl+Ill: čälimáid
    čäällim+N+Pl+Loc: čälimijn
    čäällim+N+Pl+Com: čälimijguin
    čäällim+N+Pl+Abe: čälimijttáá
    
